Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4268.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 157.011, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Rules for licensure of mobile food units. new text end new text begin The commissioner may adopt rules to implement sections 157.23 to 157.233. Rules adopted under this subdivision must be narrowly tailored to address a demonstrable risk to the health or safety of the public and must not: new text end new text begin (1) limit the number of mobile food unit licenses issued by the commissioner; new text end new text begin (2) establish requirements for the hours mobile food units may operate; new text end new text begin (3) restrict a mobile food unit's propane capacity below the capacity otherwise allowed in law for commercial vehicles; or new text end new text begin (4) require a mobile food unit to: new text end new text begin (i) operate outside a specific perimeter surrounding a food and beverage service establishment or other commercial establishment; new text end new text begin (ii) enter into an agreement with a food and beverage service establishment or other commercial establishment, except as necessary to properly dispose of grease and other cooking waste; new text end new text begin (iii) have a handwashing sink in a mobile food unit from which only prepackaged food is sold; new text end new text begin (iv) enter into an agreement with a commissary if the mobile food unit contains the equipment required by law and properly disposes of grease and other cooking waste; new text end new text begin (v) provide to the commissioner, as a condition of obtaining or maintaining a mobile food unit license, the fingerprints of any individual applying for or holding a mobile food unit license; new text end new text begin (vi) install a global positioning system tracking device on the mobile food unit; new text end new text begin (vii) keep the mobile food unit in constant motion except when serving customers; new text end new text begin (viii) require the mobile food unit to have an additional fire inspection if the mobile food unit passed a fire inspection in the preceding 12 months; or new text end new text begin (ix) submit to health inspections by entities other than the commissioner or a local agency with delegated authority to conduct health inspections. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 157.15, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Application. The definitions in this section apply to deleted text begin sections 157.011 and 157.15 to 157.22deleted text end new text begin this chapternew text end . Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 157.16, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Transfer of certain mobile food unit fees. new text end new text begin Each fiscal year, the commissioner must transfer to the local units of government in which a mobile food unit operated in the previous fiscal year a portion of the annual base fees and additional annual fees paid by the mobile food unit. Using data reported to the commissioner under section 157.233, subdivision 2, the amount of a mobile food unit's fees transferred to a local unit of government must be in proportion to the number of days the mobile food unit operated in the local unit of government's jurisdiction in the previous fiscal year relative to the total number of days the mobile food unit operated in Minnesota in the previous fiscal year. The commissioner must establish a methodology for determining the fee amounts to transfer to local units of government and may set minimum and maximum fee amounts that may be transferred under that methodology. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 157.20, subdivision 2a, is amended to read: Subd. 2a. Risk categories. (a) High-risk establishment. "High-risk establishment" means a public pool, or any food and beverage service establishment, hotel, motel, lodging establishment, or resort that: (1) serves potentially hazardous foods that require extensive processing on the premises, including manual handling, cooling, reheating, or holding for service; (2) prepares foods several hours or days before service; (3) serves menu items that epidemiologic experience has demonstrated to be common vehicles of food-borne illness; (4) has a public swimming pool; or (5) draws its drinking water from a surface water supply. (b) Medium-risk establishment. "Medium-risk establishment" means a food and beverage service establishment, hotel, motel, lodging establishment, or resort that: (1) serves potentially hazardous foods but with minimal holding between preparation and service; or (2) serves foods, such as pizza, that require extensive handling followed by heat treatment. (c) Low-risk establishment. "Low-risk establishment" means a food and beverage service establishment, hotel, motel, lodging establishment, or resort that is not a high-risk or medium-risk establishment. (d) Risk exceptions. deleted text begin Mobile food units,deleted text end Seasonal permanent and seasonal temporary food stands, food carts, and special event food stands are not inspected on an established schedule and therefore are not defined as high-risk, medium-risk, or low-risk establishments. (e) School inspection frequency. Elementary and secondary school food service establishments must be inspected according to the assigned risk category or by the frequency required in the Richard B. Russell National School Lunch Act, whichever frequency is more restrictive. new text begin (f) Mobile food units. The commissioner must categorize mobile food units according to the risk categories in paragraphs (a) to (c). new text end Sec. 5. new text begin [157.23] REGULATION OF MOBILE FOOD UNITS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Licensure. new text end new text begin In order to operate in this state, a mobile food unit must be licensed under this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter. A separate license is required for each mobile food unit. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Relation to local law. new text end new text begin (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b), a mobile food unit must comply with local laws governing mobile food unit operations in the jurisdictions in which the mobile food unit operates. new text end new text begin (b) This chapter and rules adopted under this chapter preempt any local law that regulates the operation of mobile food units in a manner that conflicts with this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter. new text end new text begin (c) A local unit of government must not: new text end new text begin (1) prohibit from operating in its jurisdiction a mobile food unit that is licensed under this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter and that is operating in compliance with state law and with the local unit of government's laws that are not in conflict with this chapter; or new text end new text begin (2) impose a local fee on a mobile food unit for the mobile food unit to operate in the jurisdiction of the local unit of government. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Delegation. new text end new text begin (a) As part of a delegation agreement under section 145A.07, the commissioner may delegate to a local agency the authority to perform one or more of the following duties: licensure of mobile food units, conducting plan reviews for mobile food units, and conducting preoperational inspections and periodic health inspections of mobile food units. new text end new text begin (b) A local agency that performs one or more of the functions listed in paragraph (a) according to a delegation agreement: new text end new text begin (1) must collect the applicable fees under section 157.16 for the functions performed; new text end new text begin (2) must transmit to the commissioner the annual base fee, additional annual fee, statewide hospitality fee, and technology fee collected; and new text end new text begin (3) may retain any fees collected for preoperational inspections, health inspections, or plan reviews to cover the local agency's cost of conducting the inspection or plan review. new text end new text begin (c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a local agency to enter into a delegation agreement under section 145A.07 or to assume duties related to licensure, plan reviews, or inspections of mobile food units. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin [157.231] PERIODIC HEALTH INSPECTIONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Health inspections. new text end new text begin The commissioner must perform periodic health inspections of mobile food units. The commissioner must determine the frequency with which a mobile food unit is inspected based on the risk category that applies to the mobile food unit and the results of previous health inspections. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Location for health inspection. new text end new text begin The commissioner must provide notice to a mobile food unit when the commissioner plans, within a specified period of time, to conduct a health inspection of the mobile food unit. Upon receipt of this notice, the mobile food unit must submit to the commissioner, in a form and manner specified by the commissioner, a list of the locations at which the mobile food unit plans to operate during the time period specified in the notice. The commissioner must use this list of locations to schedule a health inspection of the mobile food unit. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin [157.232] MOBILE FOOD UNIT LICENSING GUIDE. new text end new text begin The commissioner must develop and make available on the department website a guide on mobile food unit licensure. The guide must include instructions for obtaining, maintaining, and renewing a mobile food unit license and information on the standards for health inspections of a mobile food unit. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin [157.233] STATEWIDE DATABASE OF MOBILE FOOD UNITS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Database. new text end new text begin The commissioner must establish and administer a statewide database on mobile food units for use by the commissioner and local agencies. The database must include: new text end new text begin (1) a list of the mobile food units licensed under this chapter; new text end new text begin (2) for each mobile food unit, the results of health inspections and copies of the inspection reports; new text end new text begin (3) a list of public complaints made against mobile food units that resulted in disciplinary action or corrective action and, for each complaint, the disciplinary action or corrective action imposed; and new text end new text begin (4) mobile food unit itineraries submitted under subdivision 2. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Itineraries. new text end new text begin A mobile food unit must submit to the commissioner an itinerary of the locations at which the mobile food unit plans to operate. The commissioner shall establish requirements for the form, manner, and frequency of these submissions and the time period the itinerary must cover. new text end Sec. 9. new text begin TRANSITION PLAN; TRANSFER OF DUTIES.new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of health, in consultation with the commissioner of agriculture, shall prepare and implement a plan to transfer mobile food units regulated by the commissioner of agriculture to the regulatory authority of the commissioner of health. new text end new text begin (b) Section 15.039 applies to the transfer of the regulation of certain mobile food units from the commissioner of agriculture to the commissioner of health. new text end Sec. 10. new text begin REVISOR INSTRUCTION.new text end new text begin The revisor of statutes, in consultation with the Department of Health, Department of Agriculture, House Research Department, and Senate Counsel, Research, and Fiscal Analysis, shall prepare legislation that amends Minnesota Statutes as necessary to conform with this act. The revisor shall submit the proposal, in a form ready for introduction, during the 2027 regular session to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over health. new text end